Utah statutes.
53B-7-105.   Higher education cost disclosure.

(1)  Each institution within the state system of higher education shall, at the time of registration, plainly disclose to all of its undergraduate resident students the following amounts, in dollar figures for a full-time equivalent student:

(a)  the full cost of instruction;

(b)  the amount collected from student tuition and fees; and

(c)  the difference between the amounts described under Subsections (1)(a) and (b).

(2)  The disclosure under Subsection (1)(c) shall also clearly indicate that this balance was paid by state tax dollars and other money.



Enacted by Chapter 116, 2004 General Session

